Virginia statutes. Title 13.1. Corporations.
Article 10. Foreign Limited Liability Companies.
§ 13.1-1060.
Merger of foreign limited liability company registered to transact business in Commonwealth.

Whenever a foreign limited liability company that is registered to transact business in the Commonwealth is a party to a merger permitted by the laws of the state or other jurisdiction under whose laws it is organized, and that limited liability company is the surviving entity of the merger, it shall, within 30 days after the merger becomes effective, deliver to the Commission for filing a copy of the instrument of merger duly authenticated by the Secretary of State or other official having custody of limited liability company records in the state or other jurisdiction under whose law it is organized. However, the filing shall not be required when a foreign limited liability company merges with a domestic corporation, limited liability company, limited partnership, business trust, or partnership; the foreign limited liability company’s articles of organization or other constituent documents are not amended by the merger; and the articles or statement of merger filed on behalf of the domestic corporation, limited liability company, limited partnership, business trust, or partnership pursuant to §

13.1-720

,

13.1-1072

,

13.1-1261

,

50-73.48:3

, or

50-73.131

contains a statement that the merger is permitted under the laws of the state or other jurisdiction in which the foreign limited liability company is organized and that the foreign limited liability company has complied with that law in effecting the merger.

Whenever a foreign limited liability company that is registered to transact business in the Commonwealth is a party to a merger permitted by the laws of the state or other jurisdiction under the laws of which it is organized, and that limited liability company is not the surviving entity of the merger, the surviving partnership, limited liability company, business trust, limited partnership, or corporation shall, if not continuing to transact business in the Commonwealth, within 30 days after the merger becomes effective, deliver to the Commission a copy of the instrument of merger duly authenticated by the Secretary of State or other official having custody of limited liability company records in the state or other jurisdiction under whose law it was organized, and comply in behalf of the predecessor limited liability company with §

13.1-1056

. If a surviving business trust, registered limited liability partnership, limited liability company, limited partnership, or corporation is to continue to transact business in the Commonwealth and has not registered as a foreign registered limited liability partnership, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership or received a certificate of authority to transact business in the Commonwealth as a foreign corporation, as the case may be, it shall, within 30 days after the merger becomes effective, deliver to the Commission an application, if a foreign registered limited liability partnership, for registration as a foreign registered limited liability partnership, if a foreign limited liability company, for registration as a foreign limited liability company, if a foreign business trust, for registration as a foreign business trust, if a foreign limited partnership, for registration as a foreign limited partnership, or, if a foreign corporation, for a certificate of authority to transact business in the Commonwealth, together with a duly authenticated copy of the instrument of merger and also a copy of its partnership certificate, statement of registered limited liability partnership, articles of organization, articles of trust, certificate of limited partnership, or articles of incorporation and all amendments thereto, duly authenticated by the Secretary of State or other official having custody of registered limited liability partnership, limited liability company, business trust, limited partnership, or corporate records in the state or other jurisdiction under whose laws it is organized, formed, or incorporated.

Upon the merger of a foreign limited liability company with one or more foreign partnerships, limited liability companies, business trusts, limited partnerships, or corporations, all property in the Commonwealth owned by any of the partnerships, limited liability companies, business trusts, limited partnerships, or corporations shall pass to the surviving partnership, limited liability company, business trust, limited partnership, or corporation except as otherwise provided by the laws of the state or other jurisdiction by which it is governed, but only from and after the time when a duly authenticated copy of the instrument of merger is filed with the Commission.

History.

1991, c. 168; 1992, c. 575; 1997, c. 190; 2004, c. 274; 2008, c. 108; 2016, c. 288.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2016, c. 288, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall not affect the validity of any filing made, or other action taken, before the effective date of this act with respect to (i) the conversion of a domestic or foreign partnership or limited partnership to a limited liability company or (ii) the domestication of a non-United States entity as a limited liability company.”

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 274, throughout the section, substituted “other jurisdiction” for “country” and “30” for “thirty” and inserted “business trust”; twice substituted “that is registered” for “authorized”; in subsection B, inserted “if a,” “if a foreign business trust, for registration as a foreign business trust,” and “articles of trust” in the last sentence; twice inserted “business trusts” in subsection C; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 108, effective April 1, 2009, added the last sentence in subsection A.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 288, in subsection A, substituted “deliver to the Commission for filing” for “file with the Commission” and “law it is organized” for “laws the merger was effected” in the first sentence; and in subsection B, substituted “30 days after the merger” for “30 days after such merger” and “law it was organized” for “laws the merger was effected.”

Law Review.

For an article, “Corporate and Business Law,” see 32 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1067 (1998).

§ 13.1-1060.1.
Entity conversion of foreign limited liability company registered to transact business in Commonwealth.

Whenever a foreign limited liability company that is registered to transact business in the Commonwealth converts to another type of entity, the surviving or resulting entity shall, within 30 days after such entity conversion becomes effective, file with the Commission a copy of the instrument of entity conversion duly authenticated by the Secretary of State or other official having custody of limited liability company records in the state or other jurisdiction under whose laws such entity conversion was effected; and

If the surviving or resulting entity is not continuing to transact business in the Commonwealth or is not a foreign corporation, business trust, limited partnership, or registered limited liability partnership, then, within 30 days after such entity conversion, it shall comply on behalf of the predecessor limited liability company with the provisions of §

13.1-1056

; or

If the surviving or resulting entity is a foreign corporation, business trust, limited partnership, or registered limited liability partnership and is to continue to transact business in the Commonwealth, then, within such 30 days, it shall deliver to the Commission an application for a certificate of authority or registration to transact business in the Commonwealth or, in the case of a foreign registered limited liability partnership, a statement of registration.

Upon the entity conversion of a foreign limited liability company that is registered to transact business in the Commonwealth, all property in the Commonwealth owned by the foreign limited liability company shall pass to the surviving or resulting entity except as otherwise provided by the laws of the state or other jurisdiction by which it is governed, but only from and after the time when a duly authenticated copy of the instrument of entity conversion is filed with the Commission.

History.

2004, c. 274.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 487, cl. 3 provides: “That until July 1, 2023, the term ‘incorporation surrender’ when used in any provision of Chapter 10 (§

13.1-801

et seq.) of Title 13.1 of the Code of Virginia, the term ‘organization surrender’ when used in any provision of Chapter 12 (§

13.1-1000

et seq.) of Title 13.1 of the Code of Virginia, and the term ‘trust surrender’ when used in any provision of Chapter 14 (§

13.1-1200

et seq.) of Title 13.1 of the Code of Virginia shall also be construed to mean ‘domestication,’ and the term ‘entity conversion’ when used in any provision of Chapter 10, 12, or 14 of Title 13.1 of the Code of Virginia shall also be construed to mean ‘conversion.’ ”